Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.050

Allowance for support of dependents—Sale of property.

Whenever a petition is filed in said estate from which it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the owner of such property left a spouse or domestic partner, child or children, dependent upon such absentee for support or upon the property in the estate of such absentee, either in whole or in part, the court shall hold a hearing on said petition, after such notice as the court may direct, and upon such hearing shall enter such order as it deems advisable and may order an allowance to be paid out of any of the property of such estate, either community or separate, as the court shall deem reasonable and necessary for the support and maintenance of such dependent or dependents, pending the return of the absentee, or until such time as the property of said estate may be provisionally distributed to the presumptive heirs or to the devisees and legatees. Such allowance shall be paid by the trustee to such persons and in such manner and at such periods of time as the court may direct. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section the court may direct the sale of any of the property of the estate, either real or personal, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 11.80.040.

[ 2008 c 6 s 933; 1965 c 145 s 11.80.050. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 80 s 1; RRS s 1715-4a.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.